Hawaii, session 2025, HB985.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that pesticide applications occurring near schools need to be further studied to ensure Hawaii's children are not being impacted by off-target pesticide drift. The legislature also finds that the department of agriculture has initiated a study on pesticide drift for schools statewide.  The legislature recognizes the importance of this project to ensure children's safety and appropriate uses of pesticides for agricultural food security. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds for the continued monitoring of pesticide drift in schools statewide. SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the pesticide use revolving fund the sum of $323,484 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the sum of $311,903 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027, to carry out the purposes of this Act, including for continued monitoring of pesticide drift in schools statewide. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of agriculture. SECTION 3. This Act, upon its approval, shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST